District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.20

Contributions to exploratory committees.

When an individual decides to run for office and becomes a candidate, contributions received during the exploratory period shall apply to the campaign contribution limits for the candidate as provided under § 1-1163.33.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 320, 59 DCR 1862